Maine, session 132, LD1916.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA c. 313 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 313
AUTOMATIC SEALING OF CERTAIN CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION
§2331. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Another jurisdiction. "Another jurisdiction" has the same meaning as in Title
17-A, section 2, subsection 3-B.
2. Bureau. "Bureau" means the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police,
State Bureau of Identification.
3. Criminal history record information. "Criminal history record information" has
the same meaning as in Title 16, section 703, subsection 3.
4. Criminal justice agency. "Criminal justice agency" has the same meaning as in
Title 16, section 703, subsection 4.
5. Dissemination. "Dissemination" has the same meaning as in Title 16, section 703,
subsection 6.
6. Eligible criminal conviction. "Eligible criminal conviction" means a conviction
for a crime committed on or after January 1, 2001 and prior to January 30, 2017 for the
following:
A. Aggravated trafficking, furnishing or cultivation of scheduled drugs under Title
17-A, former section 1105 when the person was convicted of cultivating scheduled
drugs, that scheduled drug was marijuana and the aggravated crime was a Class D
crime;
B. Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D, subsection
1, paragraph A, subparagraph (4);
C. Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D, subsection
1, paragraph B-1, subparagraph (4);
D. Aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D, subsection
1, paragraph D, subparagraph (4); or
E. Unlawful possession of scheduled drugs under Title 17-A, former section 1107 when
that scheduled drug was marijuana and the crime was a Class D or Class E crime.
§2332. Statutory prerequisites for automatic sealing of criminal history record
information
Criminal history record information relating to a specific criminal conviction may be
sealed under this chapter only if:
Page 1 - 132LR2461(01)

1. Eligible criminal conviction. The criminal conviction is an eligible criminal
conviction;
2. Other convictions in this State. The person has not been convicted of a crime in
this State and has not had a criminal charge dismissed as a result of a deferred disposition
pursuant to Title 17-A, former chapter 54-F or Title 17-A, chapter 67, subchapter 4 since
the time at which the person fully satisfied each of the sentencing alternatives imposed
under Title 17-A, section 1502, subsection 2 for the person's most recent eligible criminal
conviction up until the time the bureau submits the criminal history record information
related to that eligible criminal conviction to the Administrative Office of the Courts under
section 2333, subsection 2;
3. Convictions in another jurisdiction. The person has not been convicted of a crime
in another jurisdiction since the time at which the person fully satisfied each of the
sentencing alternatives imposed under Title 17-A, section 1502, subsection 2 for the
person's most recent eligible criminal conviction up until the time the bureau transfers the
criminal history record information related to that eligible criminal conviction to the
Administrative Office of the Courts under section 2333, subsection 2; and
4. Pending criminal charges. The person does not have any pending criminal charges
in this State or in another jurisdiction.
§2333. Automatic sealing of criminal history record information
Criminal history record information for an eligible criminal conviction in which the
person convicted meets the requirements of section 2332 must be sealed by the court having
jurisdiction over the criminal proceeding that resulted in the eligible criminal conviction in
accordance with this section.
1. Monthly examination of records. The bureau shall at least once a month examine
criminal history record information collected and maintained by the bureau pursuant to
Title 25, section 1541, subsection 4-A to identify criminal history record information that
may meet the requirements of section 2332.
The Commissioner of Public Safety may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
2. Transfer of records; records review. If the bureau determines that any criminal
history record information examined pursuant to subsection 1 meets the requirements of
section 2332, the bureau shall transfer that criminal history record information, along with
any supporting documents or data, to the Administrative Office of the Courts. Upon
receipt, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall review its files to determine whether
it has in its possession any criminal history record information or other information related
to the criminal history record information submitted to it by the bureau. The Administrative
Office of the Courts shall transfer any information or data found along with the information
and data received from the bureau and any additional supporting documents the
Administrative Office of the Courts determines relevant to the court having jurisdiction
over the underlying criminal proceeding.
3. Review; written findings. Upon receipt of criminal history record information,
along with any supporting documents or data, and information under subsection 2, the court
having jurisdiction over the underlying criminal proceeding shall review those records, data
Page 2 - 132LR2461(01)

415 and information to determine if the records, data and information meet the requirements of
426 subsection 2332.
A. If the court determines that the records under this subsection meet the requirements
of section 2332, the court shall issue an order sealing the criminal history record
information of the eligible criminal conviction that was the subject of the records
reviewed.
B. If the court determines that the records under this subsection do not establish one or
more of the requirements of section 2332, the court shall issue a written order
containing findings of fact supporting the court's determination that the records are not
subject to automatic sealing.
4. Notice to bureau. The court shall electronically transmit notice of the court's order
under subsection 3 to the bureau. If the court issues an order sealing the criminal history
record information under subsection 3, paragraph A, the bureau shall promptly amend its
records relating to the person's eligible criminal conviction for automatic sealing to reflect
that the criminal history record information relating to that criminal conviction is sealed
and that dissemination is governed by section 2265 and the bureau shall send notification
of compliance with this subsection to the person's last known address. If the court issues
an order denying the sealing of criminal history record information under subsection 3,
paragraph B, the bureau shall file that order with the corresponding criminal history record
information.
5. Cooperation. The Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police;
Department of Corrections; judicial branch; and criminal justice agencies that collect,
maintain or disseminate criminal history record information shall cooperate with the bureau
and assist it with carrying out the purposes and duties of this section.
§2334. Limited disclosure of eligible criminal conviction
A person whose eligible criminal conviction is the subject of a sealing order under
section 2333, subsection 3, paragraph A may respond to inquiries from persons other than
criminal justice agencies and other entities that are authorized to obtain the sealed criminal
history record information under section 2265 by not disclosing the existence of the eligible
criminal conviction without being subject to any sanctions under the laws of this State.
Other than when responding to criminal justice agencies or when under oath while being
prosecuted for a subsequent crime, a person whose eligible criminal conviction is the
subject of a sealing order does not violate Title 17-A, section 451, 452 or 453 by not
disclosing the eligible criminal conviction.
§2335. Review of determination of eligibility; motion to seal criminal history record
information
1. Appeal by person. A person aggrieved by a written order under section 2333,
subsection 3, paragraph B may not appeal as a matter of right. The manner for a person to
file a motion to appeal must be determined by rule of the Supreme Judicial Court.
2. Appeal by State. If the State is aggrieved by an order under section 2333,
subsection 3, paragraph A, the State may appeal as a matter of right, and a certificate of
approval by the Attorney General is not required. The manner and any conditions for an
appeal by the Attorney General must be determined by rule of the Supreme Judicial Court.
Page 3 - 132LR2461(01)

3. Motion to seal criminal history record information; alternative to automatic
sealing. This chapter may not be construed to prevent a person from filing a written motion
seeking a court order sealing the person's criminal history record information relating to a
specific criminal conviction in accordance with section 2263.
Sec. 2. Rules. The Supreme Judicial Court shall establish rules relating to the process
of appealing a motion to seal criminal history record information by January 1, 2026.